Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB297.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 15.420 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 15.410 to 15.510, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Cabinet" means the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet;
(2) (a) "Police officer" means:
1. A local officer, limited to:
a. A full-time:
i. Member of a lawfully organized police department of
county, urban-county, or city government; or
ii. Sheriff or full-time deputy sheriff, including any sheriff
providing court security or appointed under KRS 70.030;
b. A school resource officer as defined in KRS 158.441; or
c. One (1) of the following who is otherwise eligible for an annual
supplement established in accordance with KRS 15.460, but who
does not receive one:
i. An officer serving on a joint task force;
ii. A detective employed by a county attorney;
iii. A process server for juvenile courts within a consolidated
local government; and
iv. A local alcoholic beverage control investigator appointed
pursuant to KRS Chapter 241; and
2. A state officer, limited to:
a. A public university police officer;
b. A Kentucky state trooper;
c. A Kentucky State Police arson investigator;
d. A Kentucky State Police hazardous device investigator;
Page 1 of 3
BR146400.100 - 1464 - XXXX 2/19/2026 2:58 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1464
e. A Kentucky State Police legislative security specialist;
f. A Kentucky vehicle enforcement officer;
g. A Kentucky Horse Park mounted patrol officer, subject to KRS
15.460(1)(f);
h. A Kentucky state park ranger, subject to KRS 15.460(1)(f);
i. An agriculture investigator;
j. A charitable gaming investigator;
k. An alcoholic beverage control investigator;
l. An insurance fraud investigator;
m. An Attorney General investigator;
n. A Kentucky Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources game
warden, subject to KRS 15.460(1)(e);[ and]
o. Any detective for a Commonwealth's attorney who would
otherwise be eligible for a supplement established in accordance
with KRS 15.460, but who does not receive one; and
p. A Kentucky State Fair Board special police officer, subject to
KRS 15.460(1)(f);
who is responsible for the prevention and detection of crime and the
enforcement of the general criminal laws of the state;
(b) "Police officer" does not include any sheriff who earns the maximum
constitutional salary for this office, any special deputy sheriff appointed under
KRS 70.045, any constable, deputy constable, district detective, deputy
district detective, special local peace officer, auxiliary police officer, or any
other peace officer not specifically authorized in KRS 15.410 to 15.510;
(3) "Police department" means the employer of a police officer;
(4) "Retirement plan" means a defined benefit plan consisting of required employer
contributions pursuant to KRS 61.565, 61.702, or any other provision of law;
Page 2 of 3
BR146400.100 - 1464 - XXXX 2/19/2026 2:58 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1464
(5) "Unit of government" means any city, county, combination of cities and counties,
public university, state agency, local school district, or county sheriff's office of the
Commonwealth; and
(6) "Validated job task analysis" means the core job description that describes the
minimum entry level requirements, qualifications, and training requirements for
peace officers in the Commonwealth, and that is based upon an actual survey and
study of police officer duties and responsibilities conducted by an entity recognized
by the council as being competent to conduct such a study.
Page 3 of 3
BR146400.100 - 1464 - XXXX 2/19/2026 2:58 PM Jacketed